Utah statutes.
78B-15-303.   Denial of paternity.

A presumed or declarant father may sign a denial of his paternity.  The denial is valid only if:

(1)  a declaration of paternity signed, or otherwise authenticated, by another man is filed pursuant to Section 78B-15-305;

(2)  the denial is in a form prescribed by and filed with the Office of Vital Records, and is signed, or otherwise authenticated, under penalty of perjury; and

(3)  the presumed or declarant father has not previously:

(a)  declared his paternity, unless the previous declaration has been rescinded pursuant to Section 78B-15-306 or successfully challenged pursuant to Section 78B-15-307; or

(b)  been adjudicated to be the father of the child.

